Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2802
Metropolitan utilities district; how treated.

Whenever creation of a municipal county is proposed involving a city of the metropolitan class, the interjurisdictional planning commission shall include in its plan a recommendation with regard to the territory within which any metropolitan utilities district shall have and may exercise the power of eminent domain pursuant to subsection (2) of section 14-2116. The plan shall further include a recommendation with regard to the territory which shall be deemed to be within the corporate boundary limits or extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction of a municipality or a municipality dissolved by the creation of the municipal county for purposes of the State Natural Gas Regulation Act. The question of creation of the municipal county shall not be submitted to a vote under section 13-2810 until a law adopting the provisions required by this section has been enacted.

Laws 2001, LB 142, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 1249, § 1.

State Natural Gas Regulation Act, see section 66-1801.